Tennessee, session 114, SB1804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-21-227(e), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting instead:
(e) Whenever a furlough is granted to an inmate under the authority of this
section, the department shall notify the chief law enforcement officer of the county and
the police chief of the city, if any, in which the inmate resides that the inmate has been
granted a furlough.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1804
011422
- 1 -